Hawaii statutes.
§517-1 Court approval of disposition of
property under restraint. Notwithstanding any limitation in any instrument
creating any estate or trust, whether or not eleemosynary or incorporated, and
whether or not in effect prior to April 24, 1957, which forbids or restrains
the sale of real property of such estate or trust or which limits the terms of
lease of such property to periods less than fifty-five years, the trustees or
officers of the estate or trust, with the approval of the court, may sell the real
property of the estate or trust or may lease the same for periods up to
fifty-five years whether or not the lease shall extend beyond the expiration
date of the estate or trust. [L 1957, c 13, §2; Supp, §345A-2; HRS §517-1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next